Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.561

Power of estate of deceased partner.

If a partner dies, the deceased partner's personal representative or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee as provided in RCW 25.10.551 and, for the purposes of settling the estate, may exercise the rights of a current limited partner under RCW 25.10.331.

[ 2009 c 188 s 704.]